District of Columbia statutes.
42-1209

Certain records to be recopied for preservation; limitation on expense.

That the Recorder of Deeds of the District of Columbia shall recopy such of the records in his office as may, in his judgment and that of a judge of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia appointed for that purpose, need recopying in order to preserve the originals from destruction. The expense of such recopying may not in any fiscal year exceed $1,000 and such expense shall be certified by a judge of the Superior Court appointed for that purpose and audited by the General Accounting Office.

Feb. 26, 1907, 34 Stat. 994, ch. 1636
June 10, 1921, 42 Stat. 24, ch. 18, § 304
June 25, 1936, 49 Stat. 1921, ch. 804
June 25, 1948, 62 Stat. 991, ch. 646, § 32(b)
May 24, 1949, 63 Stat. 107, ch. 139, § 127
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 573, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(d)
1981 Ed., § 45-908.
1973 Ed., § 45-707.